Tennessee, session 114, SB0940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-156(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) "Drug or alcohol violation" means a violation of:
(A) § 1-3-113;
(B) § 39-15-404;
(C) § 39-17-310;
(D) § 39-17-418;
(E) § 39-17-425;
(F) § 57-3-412(a)(3);
(G) § 57-3-412(a)(4);
(H) § 57-3-412(a)(5);
(I) § 57-3-412(c);
(J) § 57-4-203(b)(2);
(K) § 57-5-301(d);
(L) § 57-5-301(e); or
(M) § 57-5-303(a);
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-156, is amended by deleting
"Drug overdose" in subdivision (a)(2) and substituting "Overdose"; by deleting "a drug overdose"
wherever it appears in subdivisions (a)(5)(C) and (c)(1) and in subsection (b) and substituting
SB0940
002834
- 1 -

"an overdose"; by deleting "such drug overdose" in subsection (b) and substituting "such
overdose"; and by deleting "drug overdoses" in subsection (b) and substituting "overdoses".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-156, is amended by deleting
"drug violation" wherever it appears in subsection (b) and substituting "drug or alcohol violation".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, at 12:01 a.m., the public welfare
requiring it.
- 2 - 002834